Utah statutes.
78A-6-704.   Appeals from serious youth offender and certification proceedings.

(1)  A minor may, as a matter of right, appeal from:

(a)  an order of the juvenile court binding the minor over to the district court as a serious youth offender pursuant to Section 78A-6-702; or

(b)  an order of the juvenile court, after certification proceedings pursuant to Section 78A-6-703, directing that the minor be held for criminal proceedings in the district court.

(2)  The prosecution may, as a matter of right, appeal from:

(a)  an order of the juvenile court that a minor charged as a serious youth offender pursuant to Section 78A-6-702 be held for trial in the juvenile court; or

(b)  a refusal by the juvenile court, after certification proceedings pursuant to Section 78A-6-703, to order that a minor be held for criminal proceedings in the district court.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

